pt-BR: Posição da quilha: Central; Quad trailer; Lateral; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Outra
ko: 핀 위치: 중앙; 쿼드 트레일러; 측면; 스킴; 트레일러; 트윈; 기타
bg-BG: Позиция на перката: Централна; Quad trailer; Странична; Скимборд (Skim); Задна (Trailer); Двойна (Twin); Други
it: Posizione finale: Centrale; Quad trailer; Laterale; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Altro
zh-CN: 鳍片位置: 中间; 四鳍后置; 侧面; 浅水板; 后置; 双; 其他
vi: Vị trí vây: Ở giữa; Vây Quad trailer; Ở hai bên; Skim; Vây Trailer; Đôi; Khác
nb: Finneposisjon: Senter; Quad trailer; Side; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Annet
sk-SK: Poloha plutiev: Stred; Quad trailer; Bočné; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Iné
zh-TW: 鰭片位置: 中間; 四舵後舵; 兩側; 沙板用; 後舵; 雙舵; 其他
de: Position der Flosse: Mitte; Quad-Trailer; Seite; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Sonstige
fi: Evän asento: Keskellä; Quad-trailer; Sivu; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Muu
ru: Положение плавника: Центральный; Задние (Quad trailer); Боковые; Ским; Трейлер (центральный малый); Твин; Другое
sv: Fenposition: Mitten; Quad trailer; Sida; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Övrigt
en: Fin position: Center; Quad trailer; Side; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Other
cs: Poloha ploutvičky: Střední; Zadní quad; Boční; Skim; Zadní (trailer); Twin; Jiné
th: ตำแหน่งครีบ: กลาง; ควอดเทรลเลอร์; ข้าง; สกิม; เทรลเลอร์; คู่; อื่นๆ
hu: Uszony pozíciója: Középső; Quad hátsó; Oldalsó; Skim; Trailer; Iker; Egyéb
el: Θέση πτερυγίου: Κεντρικό; Quad trailer; Πλευρικό; Skim; Trailer; Διπλό; Άλλο
da: Finneposition: Midte; Quad-trailer; Side; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Andet
ja: フィン位置: センター; クアッドトレイラー; サイド; スキム; トレイラー; ツイン; その他
ro-RO: Poziția aripioarei: Central; Quad trailer; Lateral; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Altele
lt-LT: Peleko padėtis: Centrinis; „Quad trailer“; Šoninis; „Skim“; „Trailer“ (galinis); Dvigubas; Kita
tr: Fin pozisyonu: Orta; Dörtlü arka; Yan; Skim; Arka; Çift (Twin); Diğer
pl: Pozycja płetwy: Środkowy; Quad trailer (wewnętrzne tylne); Boczny; Skim; Tylny; Twin; Inny
es: Posición de la aleta: Central; Quad trailer; Lateral; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Otra
pt-PT: Posição da barbatana: Centro; Quilha traseira quad; Lado; Skim; Traseira; Twin; Outro
fr: Position de l’aileron: Centre; Arrière quad; Latéral; Skim; Arrière; Twin; Autre
hr-HR: Položaj peraja: Sredina; Quad trailer; Bok; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Ostalo
sl-SI: Položaj smernika: Sredina; Quad trailer; Stranski; Skim; Trailer; Dvojni; Drugo
nl: Vin positie: Midden; Quad trailer; Zijkant; Skim; Trailer; Twin; Overig